src/fst/morphology/incoming/bop.lexc
!bop-bg.rev.lexc

Definitions
	v	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.v@";
	vyz	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.vyz@";
	do	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.do@";
	za	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.za@";
	iz	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.iz@";
	na	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.na@";
	nad	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.nad@";
	o	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.o@";
	ob	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.ob@";
	ot	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.ot@";
	po	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.po@";
	pod	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.pod@";
	pre	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.pre@";
	pred	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.pred@";
	pri	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.pri@";
	pro	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.pro@";
	raz	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.raz@";
	s	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.s@";
	sy	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.sy@";
	u	= "@D.SecPrefix@" "@R.Prefix.u@";
	fv	= "@R.Prefix.v@";
	fvyz	= "@R.Prefix.vyz@";
	fdo	= "@R.Prefix.do@";
	fza	= "@R.Prefix.za@";
	fiz	= "@R.Prefix.iz@";
	fna	= "@R.Prefix.na@";
	fnad	= "@R.Prefix.nad@";
	fo	= "@R.Prefix.o@";
	fob	= "@R.Prefix.ob@";
	fot	= "@R.Prefix.ot@";
	fpo	= "@R.Prefix.po@";
	fpod	= "@R.Prefix.pod@";
	fpre	= "@R.Prefix.pre@";
	fpred	= "@R.Prefix.pred@";
	fpri	= "@R.Prefix.pri@";
	fpro	= "@R.Prefix.pro@";
	fraz	= "@R.Prefix.raz@";
	fs	= "@R.Prefix.s@";
	fsy	= "@R.Prefix.sy@";
	fu	= "@R.Prefix.u@";
	sv	= "@R.SecPrefix.v@";
	svyz	= "@R.SecPrefix.vyz@";
	sdo	= "@R.SecPrefix.do@";
	sza	= "@R.SecPrefix.za@";
	siz	= "@R.SecPrefix.iz@";
	sna	= "@R.SecPrefix.na@";
	snad	= "@R.SecPrefix.nad@";
	so	= "@R.SecPrefix.o@";
	sob	= "@R.SecPrefix.ob@";
	sopo	= "@R.SecPrefix.opo@";
	sot	= "@R.SecPrefix.ot@";
	spo	= "@R.SecPrefix.po@";
	spod	= "@R.SecPrefix.pod@";
	sporaz	= "@R.SecPrefix.poraz@";
	spre	= "@R.SecPrefix.pre@";
	spred	= "@R.SecPrefix.pred@";
	spri	= "@R.SecPrefix.pri@";
	spro	= "@R.SecPrefix.pro@";
	sraz	= "@R.SecPrefix.raz@";
	ss	= "@R.SecPrefix.s@";
	ssy	= "@R.SecPrefix.sy@";
	su	= "@R.SecPrefix.u@";
	sus	= "@R.SecPrefix.us@";

	dp	= "@D.Prefix@";

	paimp	= "@P.Asp.Imp@";
	naimp	= "@N.Asp.Imp@";
	raimp	= "@R.Asp.Imp@";

	pto	= "@P.Trans.ON@";
	nto	= "@N.Trans.ON@";
	rto	= "@R.Trans.ON@";

LEXICON Root
<0:«Pref»>			Prefixes;
				StemTypes;

LEXICON Prefixes
<в "@P.Prefix.v@">		SecPrefixes;
<{въз} "@P.Prefix.vyz@">	SecPrefixes;
<{до} "@P.Prefix.do@">		SecPrefixes;
<{за} "@P.Prefix.za@">		SecPrefixes;
<{из} "@P.Prefix.iz@">		SecPrefixes;
<{на} "@P.Prefix.na@">		SecPrefixes;
<{над} "@P.Prefix.nad@">	SecPrefixes;
<о "@P.Prefix.o@">		SecPrefixes;
<{об} "@P.Prefix.ob@">		SecPrefixes;
<{от} "@P.Prefix.ot@">		SecPrefixes;
<{по} "@P.Prefix.po@">		SecPrefixes;
<{под} "@P.Prefix.pod@">	SecPrefixes;
<{пре} "@P.Prefix.pre@">	SecPrefixes;
<{пред} "@P.Prefix.pred@">	SecPrefixes;
<{при} "@P.Prefix.pri@">	SecPrefixes;
<{про} "@P.Prefix.pro@">	SecPrefixes;
<{раз} "@P.Prefix.raz@">	SecPrefixes;
<с "@P.Prefix.s@">		SecPrefixes;
<{съ} "@P.Prefix.sy@">		SecPrefixes;
<у "@P.Prefix.u@">		SecPrefixes;

LEXICON SecPrefixes
<в "@P.SecPrefix.v@">		Stems;
<{въз} "@P.SecPrefix.vyz@">	Stems;
<{до} "@P.SecPrefix.do@">	Stems;
<{за} "@P.SecPrefix.za@">	Stems;
<{из} "@P.SecPrefix.iz@">	Stems;
<{на} "@P.SecPrefix.na@">	Stems;
<{над} "@P.SecPrefix.nad@">	Stems;
<о "@P.SecPrefix.o@">		Stems;
<{об} "@P.SecPrefix.ob@">	Stems;
<{опо} "@P.SecPrefix.opo@">	Stems;
<{от} "@P.SecPrefix.ot@">	Stems;
<{по} "@P.SecPrefix.po@">	Stems;
<{под} "@P.SecPrefix.pod@">	Stems;
<{пораз} "@P.SecPrefix.poraz@">	Stems;
<{пре} "@P.SecPrefix.pre@">	Stems;
<{пред} "@P.SecPrefix.pred@">	Stems;
<{при} "@P.SecPrefix.pri@">	Stems;
<{про} "@P.SecPrefix.pro@">	Stems;
<{раз} "@P.SecPrefix.raz@">	Stems;
<с "@P.SecPrefix.s@">		Stems;
<{съ} "@P.SecPrefix.sy@">	Stems;
<у "@P.SecPrefix.u@">		Stems;
<{ус} "@P.SecPrefix.us@">	Stems;
				Stems;

LEXICON Stems
0:÷				StemTypes;

LEXICON StemTypes
<nto naimp>			NTPfStems;
<nto paimp>			NTImpStems;
<pto naimp>			TPfStems;
<pto paimp>			TImpStems;
<nto>				NTDerStems;
<pto>				TDerStems;

LEXICON NTPfStems
<{блј´еја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] [za|iz]>										Des;		!-bljéja- -> bleat (variant)
<{буј´ај} 0:[«Trunc» «CS»] po>											Des;		!-bujáj- -> become boisterous
<{д´еја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] do>											Des;		!-déja- -> bore
<{кл´еја} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] v>											Des;		!-kléja- -> clog
<{лј´ез} 0:«CS» [v|za|iz|fna sv|fpro siz]>									Des;		!-ljéz- -> go
<{пърполј´и} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] za>										Des;		!-pyrpoljí- -> flutter (variant)
<{ујд´иса} 0:[(«Trunc») «VS»] dp>										Des;		!ujdísa- -> fit
<{щј´а} 0:[«Trunc» «VS»] dp>											Des;		!štjá- -> want (auxiliary)
